Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2705.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Artificial Intelligence Workforce Impact Act.Section 2. Findings and declarations.The General Assembly finds and declares as follows:(1) The field of artificial intelligence is evolving quickly and has the potential to disrupt jobs. It is imperative to prepare the workforce in this Commonwealth to develop and work alongside this new technology and mitigate job displacement.(2) To prepare for the growth, development and deployment of artificial intelligence, the Commonwealth needs 123456789101112131415161718 a proactive approach that includes identifying the following:(i) Data and data access necessary to properly analyze the impact of artificial intelligence on the workforce in this Commonwealth.(ii) Industries in this Commonwealth projected to be most impacted by artificial intelligence.(iii) Opportunities for Commonwealth workers and other stakeholders to influence the impact of artificial intelligence across industries in this Commonwealth.(iv) Demographics of those whose career opportunities are most likely to be affected by growth of artificial intelligence.(v) The skills, expertise and education needed to effectively use artificial intelligence.(vi) Methods to ensure that necessary skills, expertise and education are accessible to all segments of the current and future workforce.Section 3. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Artificial intelligence."(1) A machine-based system that can, for a given set of human-defined objectives, make predictions, recommendations or decisions influencing real or virtual environments, including the ability to:(i) perceive real and virtual environments;(ii) abstract perceptions made under paragraph (1) into models through analysis in an automated manner; and(iii) use model inference to formulate options for 20260HB2705PN3781 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 information or action based on outcomes under subparagraphs (i) and (ii).(2) The term includes generative artificial intelligence."Generative artificial intelligence." The class of models that emulate the structure and characteristics of input data in order to generate derived synthetic content."Institutions of higher education." The term includes any of the following:(1) A community college operating under Article XIX-A of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949.(2) A university within the State System of Higher Education.(3) The Pennsylvania State University.(4) The University of Pittsburgh.(5) Temple University.(6) Lincoln University.(7) Any other institution that is designated as "State-related" by the Commonwealth.(8) Any accredited private or independent college or university.(9) Any private licensed school as defined in the act of December 15, 1986 (P.L.1585, No.174), known as the Private Licensed Schools Act."Nonpublic school." A nonprofit school, other than a public school located within this Commonwealth, in which a resident of this Commonwealth may legally fulfill the compulsory school attendance requirements of this act and that meets the applicable requirements of Title VI of the Civil Rights Act of 20260HB2705PN3781 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 1964 (Public Law 88-352, 42 U.S.C. § 2000 et seq.)."School entity." A public school, including a charter school or cyber charter school, private school, nonpublic school, intermediate unit or area career and technical school operating within this Commonwealth."Synthetic content." Information, such as images, videos, audio clips or text, that has been significantly modified or generated by algorithms, including by artificial intelligence.Section 4. Report.(a) Impact study and report.--The Department of Labor and Industry in consultation with the Department of Community and Economic Development and the Office of Administration shall, in collaboration with the individuals and entities described in subsection (c), conduct a comprehensive study on artificial intelligence and its future impact on the workforce in this Commonwealth and submit a final report to the General Assembly not later than 18 months after the effective date of this subsection. The report shall include the information and recommendations listed in subsection (b) and a summary of the collaboration efforts conducted under subsection (c).(b) Required information.--The following shall be included in the report submitted under subsection (a):(1) An identification of the specific data relating to the workforce, and the availability of the data, necessary to properly analyze the impact and growth of artificial intelligence on the workforce of this Commonwealth and outline how much of this data is privately owned and stored, and the effectiveness of Federal, State or industry efforts, including public-private partnerships, to make privately owned data on the workforce of this Commonwealth available 20260HB2705PN3781 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 for research purposes.(2) Identification of industries and occupations projected to have the most growth in artificial intelligence use, whether the technology is likely to result in the enhancement of workers' capabilities or replacement, and level of education currently consistent with industries and occupations identified.(3) Identification of opportunities for workers, educators, institutions of higher education, the General Assembly or other relevant stakeholders to influence the impact of artificial intelligence on workers across various industries.(4) Analysis of demographics which currently stand to experience expanded career opportunities and which demographics currently appear most vulnerable to career displacement due to artificial intelligence.(5) Analysis of the skills, expertise and education, including computer science literacy, needed to effectively use artificial intelligence in the workplace over the next two decades, compared to the levels of the expertise and education of the workforce as of the effective date of this paragraph, differentiating between core competencies required of the entire workforce and competencies required within the industries and occupations identified in paragraph (2).(6) Identification of methods by which necessary skills, expertise and education can be effectively delivered to the workforce in this Commonwealth.(7) Identification of industry leaders and institutions of higher education located in this Commonwealth at the forefront of research and application of artificial 20260HB2705PN3781 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 intelligence in the industries and occupations identified in paragraph (2).(8) Identification of the resources and opportunities required for school entities and institutions of higher education to deliver skills, expertise and education identified in paragraph (5).(9) Recommendations to alleviate worker displacement, prepare future workers for future economic opportunities and any other relevant observations or recommendations within the field of artificial intelligence, which shall include recommendations on methods:(i) to expand public access to privately owned workforce data, for the purpose of researching the effect of emerging technologies on the workforce in this Commonwealth;(ii) for stakeholders, workers, educators, institutions of higher education, the General Assembly or other relevant stakeholders to effectively mitigate negative impacts of artificial intelligence on segments of the workforce in this Commonwealth;(iii) to reskill or otherwise offset socioeconomic harm to demographics identified in paragraph (4) as most vulnerable to career displacement due to artificial intelligence;(iv) to encourage low cost, open source sharing of industry valued credentials certifying the types of skills, expertise and education identified in paragraph (5);(v) to ensure that core skills and competencies identified in paragraph (5) can be evaluated, updated and 20260HB2705PN3781 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 made public by relevant stakeholders as needed, given rapid developments in the field of artificial intelligence;(vi) to ensure that institutions of higher education receive resources and opportunities identified in paragraph (8);(vii) to promote knowledge sharing and capacity building between industry leaders and institutions identified in paragraph (7); and(viii) to ensure that the skills, expertise and education needed to effectively use artificial intelligence in the workplace are delivered to vulnerable demographics identified in paragraph (4), rural workers and other historically underserved segments of the workforce in this Commonwealth.(c) Collaboration.--In preparing the report under subsection (a), the Secretary of Labor and Industry and the Secretary of Community and Economic Development shall collaborate, through a series of public meetings, roundtables or other methods, with:(1) school entities;(2) institutions of higher education;(3) workforce-training organizations;(4) public sector and private sector labor organizations;(5) a broad range of business and industrial stakeholders in the technology, manufacturing, employment, human resources and service sectors, including companies, think tanks and industry organizations;(6) in the discretion of the Secretary of Labor and Industry and Secretary of Community and Economic Development, 20260HB2705PN3781 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 any Federal agency determined to be appropriate; and(7) in the discretion of the Secretary of Labor and Industry and Secretary of Community and Economic Development, any Commonwealth agency determined to be appropriate.Section 5. Expiration.This act shall expire upon transmittal of the impact study and report under section 4.Section 6. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2705PN3781 - 8 - 123456789